District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
26 act may be cited as the "Vaccine Administration Protection Amendment Act of 2026".
27 Sec. 2. An Act To relieve physicians of liability for negligent medical treatment at the
28 scene of an accident in the District of Columbia, approved November 8, 1965 (79 Stat. 1302;
29 D.C. Official Code§ 7-401 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 5, to read as follows:
30 "Sec. 5. Limitation on liability for administering vaccinations.
31 No licensed, certified, or registered health professional authorized to prescribe, dispense,
32 order, furnish, or administer vaccines, or the entity employing or contracting with such
33 professional, shall be liable in civil damages for any act or omission not constituting willful
34 misconduct or gross negligence resulting from the prescribing, dispensing, ordering, furnishing,
35 or administering of a vaccine or other immunizing agent, including the residual effects of the

36 vaccine or immunizing agent, if the prescribing, dispensing, ordering, furnishing, or
37 administering of the vaccine or other immunizing agent is authorized by District law, accords
38 with official guidance issued by the Centers for Disease Control and Protection or the
39 Department of Health, or is recommended by a recognized medical or public health organization
40 designated by the Director of the Department of Health pursuant to sections 2 and 3 of the
41 Community Health Amendment Temporary Act of 2025, effective December 11, 2025 (D.C.
42 Law 26-60; D.C. Official Code §§ 3-1201.02(11)(A), 3-1207.55 (a-1) and 7-1653.01).”
43 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
44 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
45 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
46 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
47 Sec. 4. Effective date.
48 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
49 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
50 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
51 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: February 12, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement - Vaccine Administration Protection
Emergency and Temporary Amendment Acts of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Emergency and Temporary Bills as provided to the Office of
Revenue Analysis on February 4, 2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The emergency and temporary bills establish1 protection from liability for persons authorized to
administer vaccines in the District of Columbia for certain claims arising from or related to the
prescribing, dispensing, ordering, furnishing, or administering of a vaccine2 or other immunizing
agent, including the residual effects of the vaccine or immunizing agent.
Financial Plan Impact
1 By amending Section 1 of An Act yo relieve physicians of liability for negligent medical treatment at the
scene of an accident in the District of Columbia, approved November 8, 1965 (79 Stat. 1302; D.C. Official Code
§ 7-401).
2 The vaccine or immunizing agent must be required by the law of the District of Columbia or be recommended
by a competent medical or public health organization designated by the Director of the Department of Health
through a public notice.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Vaccine Administration Protection Emergency and Temporary Amendment Acts of 2026,” Draft
Emergency and Temporary Bills as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 4, 2026.
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. There is no cost to protect persons authorized to administer vaccines in the
District of Columbia from liability for certain claims arising from or related to the administration of
vaccines.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: January 30, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Legislation, the “Vaccine Administration
Protection Emergency Amendment Act of 2025,” “Vaccine Administration Protection
Temporary Amendment Act of 2026,” and “Vaccine Administration Protection
Emergency Declaration Resolution of 2026”
(AE-26-122)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov